Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2528YC (1) 91 ll/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 142D.4, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 EXPLANATION 3 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 4 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 5 This bill eliminates the exception under the smokefree 6 air Act (Act) (Code chapter 142D), allowing smoking on the 7 gaming floors of the premises licensed pursuant to Code 8 chapter 99F (gambling structures, excursion gambling boats, and 9 racetracks). The bill thereby subjects the entirety of these 10 premises to the smoking prohibitions of the Act. 11 -1- LSB 2528YC (1) 91 ll/ns 1/ 1